California, session 20252026, AB2452.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33548 of the Education Code is amended to read:33548. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Artificial Intelligence (AI) literacy” means the knowledge, skills, and attitudes associated with how artificial intelligence works, including its principles, concepts, and applications, as well as how to use artificial intelligence, including its limitations, implications, and ethical considerations.(2) “Digital citizenship” means a diverse set of skills related to current technology and social media, including the norms of appropriate, responsible, and healthy behavior.(3) “Media literacy” means the ability to access, evaluate, analyze, and use media and information and encompasses the foundational skills that lead to digital citizenship. citizenship, including, but not limited to, an understanding of all of the following:(A) Time management and healthy behaviors on social media.(B) The negative effects of social media on mental health, including, but not limited to, addiction.(C) The distribution of information on social media.(D) How social media can manipulate behavior.(E) The permanency of sharing materials online.(F) How to maintain personal security and identify cyberbullying, predatory behavior, and human trafficking on the internet.(G) How to report suspicious behavior encountered on the internet to the appropriate authorities.(b) When the English language arts/English language development (ELA/ELD) curriculum framework is next revised after January 1, 2024, the commission shall consider incorporating the Model Library Standards developed pursuant to Section 18101. The commission shall also consider incorporating media literacy content at each grade level.(c) (1) The commission shall consider incorporating media literacy content into the mathematics, science, and history-social science curriculum frameworks when those frameworks are next revised after January 1, 2024.(2) When ELA/ELD instructional materials are next adopted by the state board after January 1, 2025, the commission shall consider including the Model Library Standards, developed pursuant to Section 18101, including media literacy content, in its criteria for evaluating instructional materials.(3) When mathematics, science, and history-social science instructional materials are next adopted by the state board after January 1, 2025, the commission shall consider including media literacy content in its criteria for evaluating instructional materials.(d) (1) The commission shall consider incorporating AI literacy content into the mathematics, science, and history-social science curriculum frameworks when those frameworks are next revised after January 1, 2025.(2) When mathematics, science, and history-social science instructional materials are next adopted by the state board after January 1, 2025, the commission shall consider including AI literacy in its criteria for evaluating instructional materials.